Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-829.60
Emergency management; utilization of services, equipment, supplies, and facilities of existing departments and agencies of state.

In carrying out the Emergency Management Act, the Governor and the principal executive officers or governing bodies of the political subdivisions of the state shall utilize the services, equipment, supplies, and facilities of existing departments, offices, and agencies of the state and its political subdivisions to the maximum extent practicable. The officers and personnel of all such departments, offices, and agencies shall cooperate with and extend such services and facilities to the Governor and to the disaster response and emergency management organizations of the state upon request.

Laws 1951, c. 315, § 11, p. 1082;

R.R.S.1943, § 81-829.26;

Laws 1973, LB 494, § 25;

Laws 1996, LB 43, § 40.